Illinois, session 104th, SB3331.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 521B-105 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/21B-105)7    Sec. 21B-105. Granting of recognition; regional 8accreditation; definitions.9    (a) "Recognized", as used in this Article in connection 10with the word "school" or "institution", means such college, 11university, or for-profit or not-for-profit entity that meets 12requirements set by the State Board of Education, in 13consultation with the State Educator Preparation and Licensure 14Board. Application for recognition of the school or 15institution as an educator preparation institution must be 16made to the State Board of Education. The State Board of 17Education, in consultation with the State Educator Preparation 18and Licensure Board, shall set the criteria by which the 19school or institution is to be judged and, through the 20secretary of the State Board, arrange for an official 21inspection and shall grant recognition of such school or 22institution as may meet the required standards. If the 23standards include requirements with regard to education in   SB3331- 2 -LRB104 17539 LNS 30967 b1acquiring skills in working with culturally distinctive 2students, as defined by the State Board of Education, then the 3rules of the State Board of Education shall include the 4criteria used to evaluate compliance with this requirement. No 5school or institution may make assignments of student teachers 6or teachers for practice teaching so as to promote segregation 7on the basis of race, creed, color, religion, sex, or national 8origin.9    Any for-profit or not-for-profit entity must also be 10approved by the Board of Higher Education. 11    All recommendations or entitlements for educator licensure 12shall be made by a recognized institution operating a program 13of preparation for the license that is approved by the State 14Board of Education, in consultation with the State Educator 15Preparation and Licensure Board. The State Board of Education, 16in consultation with the State Educator Preparation and 17Licensure Board, shall have the power to define a major or 18minor when used as a basis for recognition and licensure 19purposes.20    (b) "Regionally accredited", or "accredited", as used in 21this Article in connection with a university or institution, 22means an institution of higher education accredited by the 23North Central Association or other comparable regional 24accrediting association.25    (c) An institution of higher education approved to offer 26educator preparation programs in this State may, upon the   SB3331- 3 -LRB104 17539 LNS 30967 b1request of a public community college in this State, enter 2into a partnership agreement with the community college to 3offer an approved educator preparation program leading to 4educator licensure for individuals who already hold a 5bachelor's degree. The partnership must be approved by the 6State Board of Education, in consultation with the State 7Educator Preparation and Licensure Board.8    The State Board of Education shall adopt rules for the 9requirements of a partnership agreement under this subsection. 10    (d) An institution of higher education approved to offer 11educator preparation programs in this State may pursue 12accreditation by the Council for the Accreditation of Educator 13Preparation (CAEP). An institution of higher education that 14receives and retains CAEP accreditation may forgo the State 15reauthorization process.16    The State Board of Education shall adopt rules for the 17reauthorization of a CAEP-accredited institution of higher 18education. 19(Source: P.A. 104-128, eff. 1-1-26.)